Idaho, session 2025, H0227.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 28-9-521, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
28-9-521. UNIFORM FORM OF WRITTEN FINANCING STATEMENT AND AMEND-
MENT. (a) A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to
accept a written initial financing statement in the following form and for-
mat as prescribed by the secretary of state that is in compliance with the
standards of the uniform commercial code, except for a reason set forth in
section 28-9-516(b), Idaho Code:.






(b) A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to ac-
cept a written record in the following form and format as prescribed by the
secretary of state that is in compliance with the standards of the uniform
commercial code, except for a reason set forth in section 28-9-516(b), Idaho
Code:.






SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.